New Mexico, session 2026, SB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. TEMPORARY PROVISION--RESET FISCAL YEAR 2026
UNIT VALUE.--On verification of the number of units statewide
for fiscal year 2026, but no later than February 27, 2026,
the secretary of public education may adjust the unit value.
In adjusting the unit value in February, the public education
department shall consult with the department of finance and
administration, the legislative finance committee and the
legislative education study committee.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public
peace, health and safety that this act take effect
immediately. SB 19
Page 1